California statutes. Education Code
(11) Provides opportunities for pupils from historically underrepresented communities, foster youth, adult learners, people with children, low-income pupils, English language learners, and other populations that struggle to access career technical education and career pathway programs.

(12) (A) Reports data to the Superintendent, no later than November 1 of each fiscal year, as a program participation requirement, to allow for an evaluation of the program.

(B) Data reported pursuant to this paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, the quality indicators described in the California State Plan for Career Technical Education required by the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V), and each of the following metrics, disaggregated by
 race and gender:

(i) The high school graduation rate.

(ii) The number of pupils completing career technical education coursework.

(iii) The number of pupils earning dual credit through career technical education courses and career pathways.

(iv) The number of pupils participating in work-based learning, earn and learn activities, or service learning, linked to career technical education courses and career pathways.

(v) The number of pupils meeting academic and career-readiness standards as defined in the College/Career Indicator associated with the California School Dashboard.

(vi) The number of pupils obtaining an
 industry-recognized credential, certificate, license, or other measure of technical skill attainment.

(vii) The number of former pupils employed and the types of businesses in which they are employed.

(viii) The number of former pupils enrolled in each of the following:

(I) A postsecondary educational institution.

(II) A state apprenticeship program.

(III) A form of job training other than a state apprenticeship program.

(C) No later than January 1 of each fiscal year, the California Workforce Pathways Joint Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 12053, in consultation with the California Education Interagency
 Council established pursuant to Section 11902 of the Government Code, shall review the data metrics specified in subparagraph (B) and make recommendations to the Department of Finance, the Governor, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature as to both of the following topics:

(i) Whether these data metrics remain the most appropriate metrics to measure and evaluate program outcomes for both new and renewal applicants.

(ii) Whether other metrics should be included.

(D) The department shall make the data reported pursuant to subparagraph (B) available to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in the manner and form requested by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, on or before December 30 of each fiscal year to ensure that data is
 included in the California Community Colleges LaunchBoard data platform.

(d) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 6.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

53071.1.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2019, as part of the application process, the department shall ask applicants to indicate whether they have received a grant under the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program.

(b) On or before June 30 of each fiscal year, the department shall work with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to produce a list of grant recipients that receive funding under this program as well as through the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce
 Program in the fiscal year, including the grant amounts awarded through each program and the purpose for which each grant was awarded, and share the list with the California Workforce Pathways Joint Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 12053.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 81.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53072.

(a) A grant recipient under this chapter may consist of one or more, or any combination, of the following:

(1) School districts.

(2) County offices of education.

(3) Charter schools.

(4) Regional occupational centers or programs operated by joint powers authorities or county offices of education, provided that the application has the written consent of each participating local educational agency.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 7.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

53072.

(a) A grant recipient under this chapter may, consistent with subdivision (b), consist of one or more, or any combination, of the following:

(1) School districts.

(2) County offices of education.

(3) Charter schools.

(4) Regional occupational centers or programs operated by joint powers authorities or county offices of education, provided that the application has the written consent of each participating local educational agency.

(b) Successful applicants shall demonstrate a holistic
 approach to providing career technical education and career pathways, including by demonstrating involvement of employers, providing wraparound services for pupils, aligning proposed programs and services with current or projected labor market demand within the applicant’s region, and providing a clear explanation of how a receipt of a grant will provide programs and services related to career technical education and career pathways.

(c) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 8.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

53073.

(a) An applicant receiving a grant from this program in a prior fiscal year shall be eligible to apply to receive a renewal grant if the applicant’s career technical education program meets the requirements specified in Section 53071, and, to the extent practicable, has been evaluated and deemed successful by the Superintendent, in collaboration with the executive director of the state board, based on the metrics specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The department, in collaboration with the executive director of the state board, shall determine reporting requirements and renewal grant eligibility using metrics identified pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071.

(2) If an
 applicant for a renewal grant is subject to the requirements of Sections 52060 and 52061, Sections 52066 and 52067, or Section 47606.5, the inclusion of career technical education programs in the applicant’s local control and accountability plan and annual update shall be required to be eligible for a renewal grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 82.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53074.

The department shall consult with the executive director of the state board and entities having career technical education expertise, including, but not limited to, the California Education Interagency Council established pursuant to Section 11902 of the Government Code, state workforce investment organizations, and organizations representing business in the
 development of the request for grant applications and in the consideration of grant applications under this chapter. The department shall annually submit its list of recommended new and renewal grant recipients to the state board for review and approval before making annual grant awards. At least 30 days before submitting the list of recommended new and renewal grant recipients to the state board for review and approval, the department shall make the information specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53076 public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 9.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53075.

(a) When determining proposed grant recipients, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall do both of the following:

(1) Give positive consideration to each of the following characteristics in an applicant:

(A) Serving unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02.

(B) Serving pupil subgroups that have higher than average dropout rates as identified by the Superintendent.

(C) Located in an area of the state with a high unemployment rate.

(D) Offer an existing
 high-quality regional-based career technical education program as a joint powers agency or county office of education.

(2) Give positive consideration to programs to the extent they do any of the following:

(A) Successfully leverage one or both of the following:

(i) Existing structures, requirements, and resources of the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), California Partnership Academies, or Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grants.

(ii) Contributions from industry, labor, and philanthropic sources.

(B) Engage in regional collaboration with postsecondary educational institutions, including the
 Strong Workforce Program consortium operating in their respective geographic areas, or other local educational agencies to align career pathway instruction with postsecondary program requirements. This shall include, but not be limited to, pathway programs provided under an adopted College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement pursuant to Section 76004.

(C) Make significant investment in career technical education infrastructure, equipment, and facilities.

(D) Operate within rural school districts.

(b) When determining grant recipients, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the
 state board, shall give greatest weight to the applicant characteristics included in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) Grant recipients are encouraged to use funds provided for in subdivision (d) of Section 53070 to create high school programs that provide career-themed coursework with articulated pathways to postsecondary education, including programs established through a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement pursuant to Section 76004, and to develop pathway programs that lead into careers that are in high demand in the state.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on June 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 10.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

53075.

(a) When determining proposed grant recipients, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall do both of the following:

(1) Give positive consideration to each of the following characteristics in an applicant:

(A) Serving unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02.

(B) Serving pupil subgroups that have higher than average dropout rates as identified by the Superintendent.

(C) (i) Located in an area of the state with a high unemployment rate or a high poverty rate.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), the following definitions apply:

(I) “High unemployment rate” means a city or county, or a city and county, within California, with an unemployment rate of at least 150 percent of the California statewide unemployment rate pursuant to the most recently updated data from the Employment Development Department.

(II) “High poverty rate” means a city or county, or a city and county, within California, with a poverty rate of at least 150 percent of the California statewide poverty rate pursuant to the most recently updated data available from the United States Census Bureau’s American Community Survey five-year estimates.

(D) Offer an existing high-quality regional-based career technical education program as a joint powers agency
 or county office of education.

(2) Give positive consideration to programs to the extent they do any of the following:

(A) Successfully leverage one or both of the following:

(i) Existing structures, requirements, and resources of the federal Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act (Perkins V) (Public Law 115-224), California Partnership Academies, Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grants, the Golden State Pathways Program, or the California Regional K-16 Education Collaboratives Grant Program.

(ii) Contributions from industry, labor, and philanthropic sources.

(B) Engage in regional collaboration with postsecondary educational institutions,
 including the Strong Workforce Program consortium operating in their respective geographic areas, or other local educational agencies to align career pathway instruction with postsecondary program requirements. This shall include, but not be limited to, pathway programs provided under an adopted College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement pursuant to Section 76004.

(C) Make significant investment in career technical education infrastructure, equipment, and facilities.

(D) Operate within rural school districts.

(b) When determining grant recipients, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall give greatest weight to the applicant characteristics included in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) Grant
 recipients are encouraged to use funds provided for in subdivision (d) of Section 53070 to create high school programs that provide career-themed coursework with articulated pathways to postsecondary education, including programs established through a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement pursuant to Section 76004, and to develop pathway programs that lead into careers that are in high demand in the state, including, but not limited to, green technology, health care, information technology, education, and artificial intelligence.

(d) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 457, Sec. 11.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative June 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

53076.

For purposes of administering the program established by this chapter, the Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(a) Determine, in collaboration with the executive director of the state board, and make public on a preliminary basis at least 30 days before a regularly scheduled meeting of the state board, the allocation formula, specific funding amounts, the purposes for which grant funds may be used, allowable and nonallowable expenditures, and the number of grants to be awarded. The information specified in this subdivision shall also be provided in writing to the appropriate policy
 and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the
 Governor within 30 days following final approval of the state board.

(b) Distribute funding on a multiyear schedule, establish a process for monitoring the use of the funding, and, if necessary, cease distribution of funding and recover previously distributed funding in the case of a recipient’s failure to report the specified data to the Superintendent or comply with a grant prerequisite or minimum standard.

(c) Annually review grant recipients’ expenditures on career technical education programs for purposes of determining if the grant recipients have met the dollar-for-dollar match requirement specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53071.
 If, pursuant to Section 53076.1, an auditor determines that a grant recipient failed to meet the matching funds requirement, the Superintendent shall reduce the following year’s grant allocation in an amount equal to the unmet portion of the match requirement, if applicable. The reduction shall not reduce the grant recipient’s match requirement for the year in which the Superintendent reduces the allocation.
 If a grant recipient with an audit finding pursuant to Section 53076.1 does not have an allocation in the subsequent year to reduce, the department shall require the recipient to return the unmatched funds identified in the audit finding.

(d) Require grant recipients to submit program reports pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071.

(e) Manage the grant process, collect pertinent data, and undertake statewide program improvement activities.

(f) Promote the success of K–12 career technical education programs through statewide activities to improve and administer the program, including by facilitating system, program, and data alignment at the state and regional levels, facilitating the development and delivery of professional development training
 modules, and supporting school districts in meeting their college indicator and career indicator targets.

(g) Ensure that the department fulfills the reporting requirements in Section 53076.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 85.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53076.1.

The Controller shall include instructions in the audit guide required by Section 14502.1 that include procedures for determining that a grant recipient has met the proportional dollar-for-dollar match requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53071. The processes identified in subdivision (d) of Section 41344 or subdivision (d) of Section 41344.1 shall not apply to this audit procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 42.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

53076.2.

On or before January 31, 2024, and on or before January 31 every five years thereafter, the department shall submit to the Department of Finance, the Governor, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report evaluating the progress that local educational agencies have made, pursuant to Section 88828 and this chapter, with respect to all of the following:

(a) Expanding the availability, and supporting the ongoing provision, of high-quality, industry-valued career technical education and workforce development opportunities.

(b) Improving coordination and alignment with postsecondary educational institutions and workforce agencies and programs.

(c) Closing equity gaps in program access and completion, to the extent possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 87.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53076.4.

For purposes of the program established by this chapter, the K–12 Workforce Pathway Coordinators and the K–14 Technical Assistance Providers established pursuant to Section 88833 shall provide technical assistance and support to recipients of grants pursuant to this chapter in implementing career technical education courses, programs, and pathways consistent with the duties outlined in Section 88833.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 86.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17.5. California Career Resource Network [53086. - 53086.]

53086.

(a) There is in the department the California Career Resource Network Program, formerly called the California Occupational Information Coordinating Committee. This program is established for the purposes of Section 2328 of Title 20 of the United States Code, for the purposes of this article, and for other purposes authorized by the Legislature.

(b) The mission of the program is to provide all persons in California with career development information and resources to enable them to reach their career goals.

(c) The primary duty of the program is to distribute career information, resources, and training materials to middle school and high school counselors,
 educators, and administrators, in order to ensure that middle schools and high schools have the necessary information available to provide a pupil with guidance and instruction on education and job requirements necessary for career development.

(d) Information and resources distributed by the program shall provide all of the following:

(1) Encouragement to completing a secondary education.

(2) Career exploration tools, provided in written and multimedia format, that offer an introduction to the nature of career planning, self-assessment, methods of investigating the work world, methods of identifying and meeting education and training needs, and methods of creating a career action plan.

(3) Relevant information on the labor market and career
 opportunities.

(4) Assistance to a pupil in the acquisition and development of career competencies including the appropriate skills, attitudes, and knowledge to allow a pupil to successfully manage his or her career.

(e) (1) There is hereby established the State Agency Partners Committee composed of the following members or their designees:

(A) The Director of Employment Development.

(B) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(C) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(D) The Director of Rehabilitation.

(E) The Director of
 Social Services.

(F) The Executive Director of the California Workforce Investment Board.

(G) The Director of the Division of Adult Institutions in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(H) The Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(I) The Director of Developmental Services.

(2) The State Agency Partners Committee shall coordinate the use of network information and resources in programs that are implemented by the entities that the members of the committee represent.

(f) The program shall perform its duties only upon funding provided in the annual Budget
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 5.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Race to the Top [53100. - 53303.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [53100. - 53103.]

53100.

For the purposes of implementing the federal Race to the Top program established by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5):

(a) The Superintendent and the President of the state board may enter into a memorandum of understanding with a local educational agency.

(b) Participating local educational agencies shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, with the Superintendent and the President of the state board, that meets the requirements expressed in the Race to the Top guidelines and that is signed by as many as possible of each participating local educational agency’s:

(1) Superintendent of schools, or their equivalents.

(2) President of the local governing boards, or their equivalents.

(3) Leader of any local collective bargaining unit for teachers, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53101.

(a) The Governor, the Superintendent, and the state board shall jointly develop a single high-quality plan or multiple plans, in collaboration with participating local educational agencies, as necessary, to submit as part of an application for federal Race to the Top funds, authorized under the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(b) The plan shall include a budget or expenditure plan consistent with the requirements of the Race to the Top program and application. At a minimum, the plan shall address how the Race to the Top program funds and any other applicable federal funds shall be used to provide resources to the low-achieving and persistently lowest-achieving schools as defined in
 this chapter. These resources may include, but are not necessarily limited to, professional development, technical assistance, and partnering with schools that have successfully transitioned from low- to higher-performing status.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for local educational agencies be the highest priority in the allocation of Race to the Top program funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 35.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

53102.

(a) On or before January 1, 2011, the Superintendent shall contract for an independent evaluation of the implementation and impact of the state plan submitted in application for a federal Race to the Top Fund competitive grant award.

(b) On or before September 1, 2010, the Superintendent shall convene a working group consisting of staff representing the policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Department of Finance, the Governor, the state board, and the department to do all of the following:

(1) Jointly develop the parameters of the evaluation.

(2) Make recommendations regarding development of any request for proposals or request for applications used to solicit contract proposals, and regarding the selection of the independent evaluator.

(c) The Superintendent shall provide to the Legislature, the Governor, and the state board:

(1) An interim evaluation report on or before June 1, 2012.

(2) The final evaluation report on or before June 1, 2014.

(d) The department shall use federal funds made available from the Race to the Top Fund and detailed in the expenditure plan required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53101 for the purpose of contracting for this evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53103.

The Legislature finds and declares that this act is declaratory of the requirements and definitions specified in the federal guidelines for the federal Race to the Top Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent that the federal guidelines are revised, the state plan or plans also be revised accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Intervening in the Persistently Lowest-Achieving Schools [53200. - 53202.]

53200.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Low-achieving school” means a school described in subdivision (a) of Section 53201.

(b) “Persistently lowest-achieving school” means a school identified pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 53201.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53201.

The Superintendent and the state board shall establish a list of schools according to the following:

(a) Identify any Title 1 school in improvement, corrective action, or restructuring.

(b) Identify the lowest 5 percent of the schools in subdivision (a) as measured by the academic achievement of all pupils in a school in terms of proficiency on the state’s assessment under Section 1111(b)(3) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) in reading/language arts and mathematics, combined pursuant to subdivision (h).

(c) Identify any secondary school that is
 eligible for, but that does not receive, Title I funds and is in the lowest 5 percent of secondary schools as measured by the academic achievement of all pupils in a school in terms of proficiency on the state’s assessment under Section 1111(b)(3) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) in reading/language arts and mathematics, combined pursuant to subdivision (h).

(d) Add to the schools identified pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, any high school that has had a graduation rate, as defined in Section 200.19(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal regulations, that is less than 60 percent in each of the previous three years.

(e) To the extent allowable under federal law, exclude from the schools identified pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, a school that meets any of the following, except as
 provided in subdivision (f):

(1) The school is a county community school operated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1980) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) The school is a juvenile court school operated pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(3) The school provides educational services exclusively to individuals with exceptional needs as defined in Section 56026.

(4) The school has experienced academic growth of at least 50 points over the previous five years as measured by the Academic Performance Index, using the most recent data available.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a school that meets any of the criteria in
 subdivision (e) shall not be excluded from the schools identified pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, if both the Superintendent and the state board find cause not to exclude the school.

(g) To the extent allowable under federal law, a community day school, operated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48660) of Chapter 4 of Part 27, may be excluded from the schools identified pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, if both the Superintendent and the state board find cause to exclude the school.

(h) For the purposes of identifying the lowest 5 percent of the schools pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), the Superintendent and the state board may use a methodology consistent with the methodology used to calculate the Academic Performance Index in order to create composite results across content areas and grade levels in reading/language arts and
 mathematics pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), unless the Superintendent and the state board develop a more appropriate methodology to meet the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c).

(i) Prior to the implementation of subdivision (h), the Superintendent and the state board shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53201.5.

The Superintendent shall notify the governing board of a school district, county superintendent of schools, or the governing body of a charter school or its equivalent, that one or more of the schools in its jurisdiction have been identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53202.

(a) For purposes of implementing the federal Race to the Top program established by Sections 14005 and 14006 of Title XIV of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), the governing board of a school district, county superintendent of schools, or the governing body of a charter school or its equivalent, shall implement, for any school identified by the Superintendent as persistently lowest-achieving pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 53200, unless the Superintendent and the state board determines, to the extent allowable under federal law, that the school has implemented a reform within the last two years that conforms to the requirements of the interventions required by the Race to the Top program and is showing significant
 progress, one of the following four interventions for turning around persistently lowest-achieving schools described in Appendix C of the Notice of Final Priorities, Requirements, Definitions, Selection Criteria for the Race to the Top program published in Volume 74 of Number 221 of the Federal Register on November 18, 2009:

(1) The turnaround model.

(2) The restart model.

(3) School closure.

(4) The transformation model.

(b) Prior to the governing board meeting to select one of the four interventions described in subdivision (a), the governing board of a school district, county superintendent of schools, or the governing body of a charter school or its equivalent, with one or more
 persistently lowest-achieving schools shall hold at least two public hearings to notify staff, parents, and the community of the designation and to seek input from staff, parents, and the community regarding the option or options most suitable for the applicable school or schools in its jurisdiction. At least one of those public hearings shall be held at a regularly scheduled meeting, if applicable, and at least one of the public hearings shall be held on the site of a school deemed persistently lowest-achieving.

(c) In addition to meeting the requirements specified in Appendix C of the Notice of Final Priorities, Requirements, Definitions, Selection Criteria for the Race to the Top program published in Volume 74 of Number 221 of the Federal Register on November 18, 2009, a persistently lowest-achieving school implementing the turnaround or transformation model may participate in a school-to-school partnership program by working with a mentor
 school that has successfully transitioned from a low-achieving school to a higher-achieving school.

(1) For purposes of this article, a mentor school is a school that meets either of the following:

(A) The school has exited Program Improvement pursuant to the No Child Left Behind Act.

(B) The school has increased, in the statewide rankings based on the Academic Performance Index, by two or more deciles over the last five years, using the most recent data available.

(2) The principal and, at the discretion of the principal, the staff of a mentor school shall provide guidance to a persistently lowest-achieving school to develop a reform plan for the school using the required elements of the turnaround or transformation model, and provide guidance and
 advice on how the mentor school was able to transform the culture of the school from low-achieving to higher-achieving and how that transformation could be replicated at the school implementing a turnaround or transformation model.

(3) To the extent that federal funds are made available for this purpose pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53101, the mentor school shall receive funds for serving as a mentor school. As a condition for receipt of funds, the principal, and at the principal’s discretion, the staff, of a mentor school shall meet regularly with the assigned persistently lowest-achieving school for a period of at least three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 8.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Parent Empowerment [53300. - 53303.]

53300.

For any school not identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school under Section 53201 which, after one full school year, is subject to corrective action pursuant to paragraph (7) of Section 1116(b) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and continues to fail to make adequate yearly progress, and has an Academic Performance Index score of less than 800, and where at least one-half of the parents or legal guardians of pupils attending the school, or a combination of at least one-half of the parents or legal guardians of pupils attending the school and the elementary or middle schools that normally matriculate into a middle or high school, as applicable, sign a petition requesting the local educational agency to implement one or more of
 the four interventions identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive of subdivision (a) of Section 53202 or the federally mandated alternative governance arrangement pursuant to Section 1116(b)(8)(B)(v) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), the local educational agency shall implement the option requested by the parents unless, in a regularly scheduled public hearing, the local educational agency makes a finding in writing stating the reason it cannot implement the specific recommended option and instead designates in writing which of the other options described in this section it will implement in the subsequent school year consistent with requirements specified in federal regulations and guidelines for schools subject to restructuring under Section 1116(b)(8) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and regulations and guidelines for the four interventions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53301.

(a) The local educational agency shall notify the Superintendent and the state board upon receipt of a petition under Section 53300 and upon its final disposition of that petition.

(b) If the local educational agency indicates in writing that it will implement in the upcoming school year a different alternative governance arrangement than requested by the parents, the local educational agency shall notify the Superintendent and the state board that the alternative governance option selected has substantial promise of enabling the school to make adequate yearly progress as defined in the federally mandated state plan under Section 1111(b)(2) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20
 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

53302.

(a) No more than 75 schools shall be subject to a petition authorized by this article.

(b) A petition shall be counted toward this limit upon the Superintendent and state board receiving notice from the local educational agency of its final disposition of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 73.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

53303.

A local educational agency shall not be required to implement the option requested by the parent petition if the request is for reasons other than improving academic achievement or pupil safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 29. PROGRAMS FOR DISADVANTAGED PUPILS [54000. - 54804.]



  CHAPTER 1. Educationally Disadvantaged Youth Programs [54000. - 54029.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [54000. - 54008.]

54000.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide quality educational opportunities for all children in the public schools. The Legislature recognizes that a wide variety of factors such as low family income, pupil transiency rates, and large numbers of homes where a primary language other than English is spoken have a direct impact on a child’s success in school and personal development, and require that different levels of financial assistance be provided districts in order to assure a quality level of education for all pupils.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54001.
